Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB303.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. The Transportation Cabinet Budget is as follows:
PART I
OPERATING BUDGET
(1) Funds Appropriations: There is appropriated out of the General Fund, Road
Fund, Restricted Funds accounts, or Federal Funds accounts for the fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and
ending June 30, 2027, and for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and ending June 30,
2028, the following discrete sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary. Appropriated
funds are included pursuant to KRS 48.700 and 48.710. Each appropriation is made by
source of respective fund or funds accounts. Appropriations for the budget units of the
Transportation Cabinet are subject to the provisions of Chapters 12, 42, 45, and 48 of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes and compliance with the conditions and procedures set forth
in this Act.
A. TRANSPORTATION CABINET
Budget Units
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 500,000 500,000
Restricted Funds 2,801,000 2,741,700
Road Fund 82,689,200 83,390,700
TOTAL 85,990,200 86,632,400
(1) Biennial Highway Construction Plan: The Secretary of the Transportation
Cabinet shall produce a single document that shall detail the enacted fiscal biennium
Page 1 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction Program and the 2028-2032 Highway
Preconstruction Program Plan.
(2) Adopt-A-Highway Litter Program: The Transportation Cabinet and the
Energy and Environment Cabinet may receive, accept, and solicit grants, contributions of
money, property, labor, or other things of value from any governmental agency,
individual, nonprofit organization, or private business to be used for the Adopt-a-
Highway Litter Program or other statewide litter programs. Any contribution of this
nature shall be deemed to be a contribution to a state agency for a public purpose and
shall be treated as Restricted Funds under KRS Chapter 45 and reported according to
KRS Chapter 48, and shall not be subject to restrictions set forth under KRS Chapter
11A.
(3) Riverport Improvements: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $500,000 in each fiscal year to improve public riverports within Kentucky. The
Secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, in conjunction with the Kentucky Water
Transportation Advisory Board, shall determine how the funds are distributed.
2. AVIATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,165,500 1,183,700
Restricted Funds 18,921,300 18,947,400
Federal Funds 500,800 500,800
Road Fund 835,900 833,700
TOTAL 21,423,500 21,465,600
(1) Operational Costs: Notwithstanding KRS 183.525(5), the above Restricted
Funds appropriation includes operational costs of the program in each fiscal year.
(2) Debt Service: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $835,900 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $833,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for debt service on
previously authorized bonds. Notwithstanding KRS 183.525, $835,900 in fiscal year
Page 2 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
2026-2027 and $833,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 is transferred to the Road Fund from
the Kentucky Aviation Economic Development Fund to support debt service on those
bonds.
3. DEBT SERVICE
2026-27 2027-28
Road Fund 100,330,300 103,213,000
(1) Economic Development Road Lease-Rental Payments: Included in the
above Road Fund appropriation is $100,080,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$102,963,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for Economic Development Road lease-rental
payments relating to projects financed by Economic Development Road Revenue Bonds
previously authorized by the General Assembly and issued by the Kentucky Turnpike
Authority.
(2) Debt Payment Acceleration Fund Account: Notwithstanding KRS 175.505,
no portion of the revenues to the state Road Fund provided by the adjustments in KRS
138.220(2), excluding KRS 177.320 and 177.365, shall accrue to the Debt Payment
Acceleration Fund account during the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
4. HIGHWAYS
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 197,654,900 198,294,800
Federal Funds 1,275,288,600 1,284,495,000
Road Fund 1,167,096,400 1,215,769,000
TOTAL 2,640,039,900 2,698,558,800
(1) Debt Service: Included in the above Federal Funds appropriation is
$69,146,800 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $11,351,900 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for debt
service on Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicle (GARVEE) Bonds previously
appropriated by the General Assembly.
(2) Biennial Highway Construction Program: Included in the State Supported
Page 3 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
Construction Program is $598,505,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $624,807,200 in
fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Road Fund for state construction projects in the 2026-
2028 Biennial Highway Construction Program.
(3) Highway Construction Contingency Account: Included in the State
Supported Construction Program is $31,000,000 in Road Fund each year for the Highway
Construction Contingency Account. Notwithstanding KRS 224.43-505(2)(d), included in
the Highway Construction Contingency Account is $5,000,000 in each fiscal year for the
Kentucky Pride Fund created in KRS 224.43-505. Also included in the Highway
Construction Contingency Account for Railroads is $1,600,000 in each fiscal year for
public safety and service improvements which shall not be expended unless matched with
non-state funds equaling at least 20 percent of the total amount for any individual project.
Additionally, in each fiscal year, up to $350,000 of the $1,600,000 appropriation may be
used to research the merits and responsibilities of the Kentucky Rail Office in the
Kentucky Transportation Cabinet and establish and administer the Kentucky Rail Office.
(4) County Priority Projects Program: Included in the State Supported
Construction program is $20,000,000 in each fiscal year from the Road Fund for the
County Priority Projects program to assist with county and city roads.
(5) County and City Bridge Improvement Program: Included in the State
Supported Construction Program is $25,000,000 in each fiscal year in Road Fund to
support the County and City Bridget Improvement Program.
(6) 2024-2026 Biennial Highway Construction Plan: Projects in the enacted
2024-2026 Biennial Highway Construction Plan are authorized to continue their current
authorization into the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium. If projects in previously enacted
highway construction plans conflict with the 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction
Plan, the projects in the 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction Plan shall control.
The Secretary shall make every effort to maintain highway program delivery by adhering
to the timeframes included in the 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction Plan for
Page 4 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
those projects.
(7) Kentucky Transportation Center: Notwithstanding KRS 177.320(4),
included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $290,000 in each fiscal year for the
Kentucky Transportation Center.
(8) State Match Provisions: The Transportation Cabinet is authorized to utilize
state construction moneys or Toll Credits to match federal highway moneys.
(9) Federal Aid Highway Funds: If additional federal highway moneys are
made available to Kentucky by the United States Congress, the funds shall be used
according to the following priority: (a) Any demonstration-specific or project-specific
moneys shall be used on the project identified; and (b) All other funds shall be used to
ensure that projects in the fiscal biennium 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction
Plan are funded. If additional federal moneys remain after these priorities are met, the
Transportation Cabinet may select projects from the Highway Preconstruction Program.
(10) Road Fund Cash Management: The Secretary of the Transportation Cabinet
may continue the Cash Management Plan to address the policy of the General Assembly
to expeditiously initiate and complete projects in the fiscal biennium 2026-2028 Biennial
Highway Construction Plan. Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 45, specifically including
KRS 45.242 and 45.244, the Secretary may concurrently advance projects in the Biennial
Highway Construction Plan by employing management techniques that maximize the
Cabinet's ability to contract for and effectively administer the project work. Under the
approved Cash Management Plan, the Secretary shall continuously ensure that the
unspent project and Road Fund balances available to the Transportation Cabinet are
sufficient to meet expenditures consistent with appropriations provided. The
Transportation Cabinet shall provide quarterly reports to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue when the General Assembly is not in session and the
Standing Committees on Appropriations and Revenue when the General Assembly is in
session beginning July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
(11) Carry Forward of Appropriation Balances: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229,
unexpended Road Fund and General Fund appropriations in the Highways budget unit for
the Construction program, the Maintenance program, and the Research program in fiscal
year 2025-2026 and in fiscal year 2026-2027 shall not lapse but shall carry forward.
Unexpended Federal Funds and Restricted Funds appropriations in the Highways budget
unit for the Construction program, the Maintenance program, the Equipment Services
program, the Research program, and the Eastern Kentucky State Aid Funding for
Emergencies (EKSAFE) program in fiscal year 2025-2026 and in fiscal year 2026-2027,
up to the amount of ending cash balances and unissued Highway and GARVEE Bond
Funds, to include any interest income earned on those bond funds, and grant balances
shall not lapse but shall carry forward.
(12) Federally Supported Construction Program: Included in the above Federal
Funds appropriation is $1,244,953,200 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,253,986,000 in
fiscal year 2027-2028 for federal construction projects.
(13) Highways Maintenance: Included in the above Highways Road Fund
appropriation is $493,714,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $514,624,600 in fiscal year
2027-2028 for Highways Maintenance. Highways Maintenance positions may be filled to
the extent the above funding level and the Highways Maintenance continuing
appropriation are sufficient to support those positions.
(14) Delayed Projects Status Report: The Secretary of the Transportation
Cabinet shall report by September 30 of each fiscal year to the Interim Joint Committee
on Transportation any project included in the enacted Biennial Highway Construction
Plan which has been delayed beyond the fiscal year for which the project was authorized.
The report shall include:
(a) The county name;
(b) The Transportation Cabinet project identification number;
(c) The route where the project is located;
Page 6 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
(d) The length of the project;
(e) A description of the project and the scope of improvement;
(f) The type of local, state, or federal funds to be used on the project;
(g) The stage of development for the design, right-of-way, utility, and
construction phases;
(h) The fiscal year in which each phase of the project was scheduled to
commence;
(i) The estimated cost for each phase of the project;
(j) A detailed description of the circumstances leading to the delay; and
(k) The same information required in paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subsection for
the project or projects advanced with funds initially scheduled for the delayed project.
(15) Maintenance Reentry Employment Program: Included in the above Road
Fund appropriation is $1,000,000 in each fiscal year to support contracting with a
501(c)(3) nonprofit organization or other entity that employs individuals on probation or
parole supervision to perform crew-based maintenance services. These individuals will
be selected with input from the Department of Corrections and shall provide assistance
with litter abatement, graffiti removal, and vegetation control.
(16) Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicle (GARVEE) Bonds Reauthorization:
The $150,000,000 GARVEE Bonds authorized in 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 180, Part I, 4., (15)
are reauthorized.
(17) Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicle (GARVEE) Bonds Debt Service:
Included in the above Federal fund appropriation is $7,713,200 in fiscal year 2026-2027
and $15,426,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for debt service payments related to the I-69
Ohio River crossing. Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $1,928,300 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $3,856,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for debt service payments
related to the I-69 Ohio River crossing.
(18) Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicle (GARVEE) Bonds Reauthorization:
Page 7 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
The $150,000,000 GARVEE Bonds authorized in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Part I, 4., (15)
are reauthorized.
(19) Reauthorized Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicle (GARVEE) Bonds
Debt Service: Included in the above Federal fund appropriation is $15,426,400 in each
fiscal year for debt service payments related to the Brent Spence Bridge Project.
Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $3,856,000 in each fiscal year for debt
service payments related to Brent Spence Bridge Project.
(20) I-69 Ohio River Crossing: Notwithstanding 2024 Ky Acts ch. 223, sec. 55,
the appropriation set forth in that section is not contingent upon award of a federal
Multimodal Project Discretionary Grant and shall be allocated to the 2024-2026 Biennial
Highway Construction Plan project number 2-1088.52.
(21) I-69 Ohio River Crossing: Notwithstanding KRS 176.431(1)(a), the 2024-
2026 Biennial Highway Construction Plan project number 2-1088.52 may utilize design-
build procurement methods.
(22) I-69 Ohio River Crossing: Pursuant to KRS 175B.020(10)(a)(5), the General
Assembly hereby authorizes the Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Authority
(KPTIA) to act as the developing and issuing authority as described in KRS 175B.025, as
necessary to facilitate the completion, operating, and maintenance of the I-69 Ohio River
Crossing Project and hereby ratifies the financial plan for the Project adopted by KPTIA
Resolution 2025-1 and the bi-state development agreement for the Project approved by
KPTIA Resolution 2025-2.
5. JUDGMENTS
(1) Payment of Judgments: Road Fund resources required to pay judgments
shall be transferred from the State Construction Account at the time when actual
payments must be disbursed from the State Treasury.
6. PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION
2026-27 2027-28
Page 8 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
General Fund 15,093,500 15,093,500
Restricted Funds 735,100 749,600
Federal Funds 41,838,100 41,873,800
TOTAL 57,666,700 57,716,900
(1) Nonpublic School Transportation: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $5,000,000 in each fiscal year for nonpublic school transportation.
7. REVENUE SHARING
2026-27 2027-28
Road Fund 341,452,400 360,734,600
(1) County Road Aid Program: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation
is $128,963,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $136,265,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for
the County Road Aid Program in accordance with KRS 177.320, 179.410, 179.415, and
179.440. Notwithstanding KRS 177.320(2) and (4), the above amount has been reduced
by $38,000 in each year, which has been appropriated to the Highways budget unit for
the support of the Kentucky Transportation Center.
(2) Rural Secondary Program: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation
is $156,447,400 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $165,305,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for
the Rural Secondary Program in accordance with KRS 177.320, 177.330, 177.340,
177.350, and 177.360. Notwithstanding KRS 177.320(1) and (4), the above amount has
been reduced by $46,000 in each year, which has been appropriated to the Highways
budget unit for the support of the Kentucky Transportation Center.
(3) Municipal Road Aid Program: Included in the above Road Fund
appropriation is $54,263,200 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $57,335,500 in fiscal year
2027-2028 for the Municipal Road Aid Program in accordance with KRS 177.365,
177.366, and 177.369. Notwithstanding KRS 177.320(4) and 177.365(1), the above
amount has been reduced by $16,000 in each year, which has been appropriated to the
Highways budget unit for the support of the Kentucky Transportation Center.
Page 9 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
(4) Energy Recovery Road Fund: Included in the above Road Fund
appropriation is $181,000 in each fiscal year for the Energy Recovery Road Fund in
accordance with KRS 177.977, 177.9771, 177.978, 177.979, and 177.981.
(5) Continuation of the Flex Funds and the 80/20 Bridge Replacement
Programs: The Transportation Cabinet shall continue the Flex Funds and the 80/20
Bridge Replacement Programs within the Rural Secondary Program.
8. VEHICLE REGULATION
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds -0- 23,983,900 22,826,200
Federal Funds -0- 4,627,100 4,627,100
Road Fund 5,035,600 80,210,100 77,927,900
TOTAL 5,035,600 108,821,100 105,381,200
TOTAL - TRANSPORTATION CABINET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 16,759,000 16,777,200
Restricted Funds -0- 244,096,200 243,559,700
Federal Funds -0- 1,322,254,600 1,331,496,700
Road Fund 5,035,600 1,772,614,300 1,841,868,900
SUBTOTAL 5,035,600 3,355,724,100 3,433,702,500
PART II
CAPITAL PROJECTS BUDGET
(1) Capital Construction Fund Appropriations and Reauthorizations:
Moneys in the Capital Construction Fund are appropriated for the following capital
projects subject to the conditions and procedures in this Act. Items listed without
appropriated amounts are previously authorized for which no additional amount is
required. These items are listed in order to continue their current authorization into the
2026-2028 fiscal biennium. Unless otherwise specified, reauthorized projects shall
Page 10 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
conform to the original authorization enacted by the General Assembly.
(2) Expiration of Existing Line-Item Capital Construction Projects: All
appropriations to existing line-item capital construction projects expire on June 30, 2026,
unless reauthorized in this Act with the following exceptions: (a) A construction contract
for the project shall have been awarded by June 30, 2026; (b) Permanent financing or a
short-term line of credit sufficient to cover the total authorized project scope shall have
been obtained in the case of projects authorized for bonds, if the authorized project
completes an initial draw on the line of credit within the biennium immediately
subsequent to the original authorization; and (c) Grant or loan agreements, if applicable,
shall have been finalized and properly signed by all necessary parties. Notwithstanding
the criteria set forth in this subsection and KRS 45.229 and 45.770(5)(d), funds
appropriated to the 2024-2026 and 2026-2028 fiscal biennia maintenance pools shall not
lapse and shall carry forward.
(3) Bond Proceeds Investment Income: Investment income earned from bond
proceeds beyond that which is required to satisfy Internal Revenue Service arbitrage
rebates and penalties and excess bond proceeds upon the completion of a bond-financed
capital project shall be used to pay debt service according to the Internal Revenue Service
Code and accompanying regulations.
(4) Appropriations for Projects Not Line-Itemized: Inasmuch as the
identification of specific projects cannot be ascertained with absolute certainty at this
time, amounts are appropriated for specific purposes to projects which are not
individually identified in this Act in the following areas: maintenance pools.
Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, projects estimated to cost $1,000,000 and
over and equipment estimated to cost $200,000 and over shall be reported to the Capital
Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.
A. TRANSPORTATION CABINET
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
Page 11 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Road Fund 7,500,000 7,500,000
002. Ballard County Maintenance Facility and Salt Storage Additional
Reauthorization ($3,513,000 Road Fund)
Road Fund -0- 500,000
003. Construct Hopkins County Maintenance and Salt Storage Additional
Reauthorization ($2,770,000 Road Fund)
Road Fund -0- 200,000
004. Construct Breckinridge County Maintenance and Salt Facility Additional
Reauthorization ($3,500,000 Road Fund)
005. Whitley County Maintenance Facility and Salt Structure Additional
Reauthorization ($4,500,000 Road Fund)
Road Fund 400,000 -0-
006. Construct District 2 Office and Materials Lab Additional Reauthorization
($2,000,000 Road Fund)
Road Fund -0- 250,000
2. AVIATION
001. Aircraft Major Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 1,200,000 1,200,000
002. Construct Capital City Airport Terminal Building Reauthorization
($9,000,000 Restricted Funds)
003. Construct One Aircraft Maintenance Hangar Reauthorization ($6,910,000
Restricted Funds)
004. Construct Sixteen New T-Hangers Reauthorization ($2,750,000 Restricted
Funds)
005. Construct Two Medium Sized Box Hangars Reauthorization ($1,600,000
Page 12 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
Restricted Funds)
3. HIGHWAYS
001. Road Maintenance Parks - 2026-2028
Road Fund 1,500,000 1,500,000
002. Various Environmental Compliance - 2026-2028
Road Fund 500,000 500,000
003. Increase Truck Parking Capacity
Federal Funds 5,000,000 -0-
004. Jefferson County - Lease
PART III
FUNDS TRANSFER
The General Assembly finds that the financial condition of state government
requires the following action.
Notwithstanding the statutes or requirements of the Restricted Funds enumerated
below, there is transferred to the General Fund the following amounts in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and fiscal year 2027-2028:
2026-27 2027-28
A. TRANSPORTATION CABINET
1. Aviation
Agency Revenue Fund 2,040,400 1,596,600
(KRS 183.525(4) and (5))
TOTAL - FUNDS TRANSFER 2,040,400 1,596,600
PART IV
TRANSPORTATION CABINET BUDGET SUMMARY
OPERATING BUDGET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 16,759,000 16,777,200
Page 13 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1521
Restricted Funds -0- 244,096,200 243,559,700
Federal Funds -0- 1,322,254,600 1,331,496,700
Road Fund 5,035,600 1,772,614,300 1,841,868,900
SUBTOTAL 5,035,600 3,355,724,100 3,433,702,500
CAPITAL PROJECTS BUDGET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
Investment Income -0- 1,200,000 1,200,000
Federal Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
Road Fund -0- 9,900,000 10,450,000
SUBTOTAL -0- 16,100,000 11,650,000
TOTAL - TRANSPORTATION CABINET BUDGET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 16,759,000 16,777,200
Restricted Funds -0- 244,096,200 243,559,700
Federal Funds -0- 1,327,254,600 1,331,496,700
Road Fund 5,035,600 1,782,514,300 1,852,318,900
Investment Income -0- 1,200,000 1,200,000
TOTAL FUNDS 5,035,600 3,371,824,100 3,445,352,500
Page 14 of 14
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:15 AM Jacketed